Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-8,101
Interstate bridges; acquisition and disposal of property; power of department.

The department shall have the power and authority to acquire any land, real or personal property, or any easement or interest therein, which may be necessary or desirable for interstate bridge purposes, and to sell, convey, and dispose of the same, if it shall no longer be needed, in the same manner provided for state highways by subsection (3) of section 39-1320 and sections 39-1321 to 39-1323, 39-1325, and 39-1326; Provided, that the acquisition by the department, through purchase, condemnation, or gift, of any part of any boundary line bridge or boundary line toll bridge, and the land, real or personal property, or any easement or interest therein, necessary thereto, shall be accomplished in the manner provided by sections 39-8,116 to 39-8,118.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 11, p. 637.